South Dakota, session 2026, SB93.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 5-18A-17 be AMENDED:
5-18A-17. No state officer or employee who approves, awards, or administers a
contract on behalf of a state agency, may have an interest in a contract or derive a direct
benefit from a contract that is within the scope of the officer's or employee's official duties,
nor for a one-year period following the end of their employment or position as a state
officer may the officer or employee derive a direct benefit as a result of such contract
except as provided in § 5-18A-17.2. In addition, no such officer or employee may enter
into any contract, other than a contract of employment, with any state agency for a period
of one year following their leaving office or employment except as provided in § 5-18A-
17.3.This prohibition includes any state officer or employee who, in his or her official
capacity, recommends the approval or award of the contract or who supervises a person
who approves, awards, or administers the contract. This prohibition does not include any
state officer who serves without compensation or who may be paid per diem pursuant to
§ 4-7-10.4. If an officer or employee of this state has responsibility, on behalf of a state
agency, for approving, awarding, or administering a contract, that officer or employee
may not:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in 5-18A-17.2:
(a) Have an interest in a contract or derive a direct benefit from a contract that
is within the scope of the officer's or employee's official duties; or
(b) Derive a direct benefit from any contract that the officer or employee
approved, awarded, or administered on behalf of a state agency for at least
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.581.10 2 93
one year following the end of the individual's term of office or employment
with the state;
(2) Except as otherwise provided in § 5-18A-17.3, enter into any contract with a state
agency, other than an employment contract, for at least one year following the end
of the individual's term of office or employment with the state; or
(3) Except as otherwise provided in section 3 of this Act, be employed by any
organization that was the beneficiary of a contract approved, awarded, or
administered by the officer or employee, for a period of:
(a) One year, if the value of the contract was not more than five million dollars;
or
(b) Two years, if the value of the contract was more than five million dollars.
Nothing in this section may be construed to apply to an officer or employee who
serves without compensation or who is only compensated per diem pursuant to § 4-7-
10.4.
For purposes of this section, the responsibility for approving, awarding, or
administering a contract on behalf of a state agency includes supervising the approval,
award, or administration of a contract or recommending the approval or award of a
contract.
Section 2. That § 5-18A-17.2 be AMENDED:
5-18A-17.2. A governing body may authorize an officer or employee whose
responsibilities include approving, awarding, or administering a contract on behalf of a
state agency or; supervising any employee who has these responsibilities approves,
awards, or administers a contract on behalf of a state agency; or recommending to any
employee the approval or award of a contract on behalf of a state agency, to be a party
to or derive a direct benefit from a contract if:
(1) The officer or employee has provided full written disclosure to the governing body;
(2) The governing body has reviewed the:
(a) The essential terms of the transaction or contract and the state officer's or
employee's; and
(b) The role of the officer or employee in the contract or transaction; and
(3) The transaction and the terms of the contract are fair, reasonable, and not contrary
to the public interest.
The authorization shall be in writing. If a governing body authorizes an officer or
employee to be a party to or derive a direct benefit from a contract, the governing body
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.581.10 3 93
must provide the authorization in writing. Any authorization given pursuant to this section
is a public record. Each authorization shall must be filed with the commissioner of human
resources and administration, who. The commissioner shall annually compile the
authorizations and present them annually for review by to the Government Operations
and Audit Committee for review.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 5-18A:
A governing body may authorize a former officer or employee whose
responsibilities included approving, awarding, or administering a contract on behalf of a
state agency; supervising any employee who approved, awarded, or administered a
contract on behalf of the state agency; or recommending to any employee the approval
or award of a contract on behalf of a state agency, to be employed by an organization that
was the beneficiary of a contract approved, awarded, or administered by the officer or
employee, before the time permitted in § 5-18A-17, if:
(1) The governing body has reviewed:
(a) The essential terms of the transaction or contract; and
(b) The role of the officer or employee in the contract or transaction; and
(2) The transaction and the terms of the contract are fair, reasonable, and not contrary
to the public interest.
The governing body must provide the authorization in writing. Any authorization
given pursuant to this section is a public record. Each authorization must be filed with the
commissioner of human resources and administration. The commissioner shall annually
compile the authorizations and present them to the Government Operations and Audit
Committee for review.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.